Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. Deposits and Depositories

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to depositories for public moneys, see art. 15, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to the state banking commissioner, see §

13-1-601

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26B C.J.S. Depositaries § 1 et seq.

§ 9-4-801.
Board of deposits; creation; composition; records; meetings; general duties.

The state loan and investment board is established as and shall perform the duties of the board of deposits. The governor is the chairman of the board and the state treasurer is the secretary of the board for the purpose of performing the duties of the board of deposits. The records of the board of deposits kept by the secretary, or a duly certified copy thereof, are prima facie evidence of any action of the board. The board of deposits shall meet quarterly each year, or at any other time, upon the call of the chairman. The board shall designate banks within this state eligible as state depositories for the purpose of receiving on deposit funds of this state.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2487; C.S. 1920, § 2950; R.S. 1931, § 92-102; C.S. 1945, § 20-1002; W.S. 1957, § 9-587; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1102; Laws 1981, ch. 31, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; ch. 195, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “in March, June, September and December of” following “quarterly” in the next-to-last sentence; and substituted “The” for “At the June meeting” and made a related change in the last sentence.

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

, 42 A.L.R. 1290 (1925).

§ 9-4-802.
Board of deposits; application; designation of depositories; revocation of designation.

A bank applying to be a state depository shall file a written application with the secretary of the board of deposits. The application shall be accompanied by a sworn statement of the financial condition of the bank at the time the application is made and a certified resolution providing proper authority of the depository. The secretary of the board of deposits shall review all applications, prepare a recommendation regarding each, and submit a list of all applicants and his recommendations to the board. The secretary of the board shall prepare a list of all financial institutions of the state which are approved by the board to be depositories. The chairman and the secretary of the board shall certify the list to the bank collateral officer who is designated by the state treasurer. Once the bank collateral officer is designated, the state treasurer shall provide a written order to the bank declaring it a state depository until its authority is revoked by the board. Each year, designated state depositories shall submit a current statement of condition, a certified copy of a resolution indicating its authority to act as a state depository has not been revoked and any other information the secretary of the board deems necessary. If, at any time state funds are on deposit with a state depository, a state depository is subject to any public enforcement action by any federal or state regulatory entity, the state depository shall notify the secretary of the board of the regulatory action if the action is not confidential. The board may revoke a bank’s designation as a state depository at any time except that no time deposit, open account shall be withdrawn from a state depository prior to the date of maturity without providing forty-five (45) days prior written notice, absent a default by the state depository.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2488; C.S. 1920, § 2951; R.S. 1931, § 92-103; C.S. 1945, § 20-1003; W.S. 1957, § 9-588; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1103; Laws 1981, ch. 31, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 202, § 1; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, deleted “on or before the first Monday in June of each year” preceding “depository shall” and made a related change; added the last four sentences; and made related and stylistic changes.

Treasurer obligated to withdraw funds upon bank's notification of termination as depository. —

Where bank officials notify a town's mayor that the bank would no longer serve as a depository of town funds, it becomes the town treasurer's duty to withdraw the funds and place them in another properly designated depository. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

, 42 A.L.R. 1290 (1925); Reed v. People ex rel. Campbell County High Sch., 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1926).

§ 9-4-803.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; authority of treasurer; rulemaking.

The state treasurer may deposit any portion of the public monies in his possession in any bank chartered under the laws of the United States or under the law of any state if the bank is conducting business in Wyoming and has been approved under W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-818

by the board of deposits. As used in W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-818

, “bank” includes federal and state savings and loan associations. Federal and state savings and loan associations may be designated as depositories for state funds in the same manner as state and national banks.

The state treasurer may promulgate necessary rules and regulations for the implementation of the approved state depository and time deposit, open account programs.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 2489; C.S. 1920, § 2952; Laws 1925, ch. 77, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 92-104; C.S. 1945, § 20-1004; W.S. 1957, § 9-589; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1104; Laws 1981, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 98, § 1, effective March 2, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional depositories for public moneys, see art. 15, § 7, Wyo. Const.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (b).

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), substituted “have any bank chartered under the laws of the United States or under the law of any state if the bank is conducting business in Wyoming and has” for “national banks within this state or in any state banks incorporated under the laws of and doing business in this state, as” in the first sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2017.

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

, 42 A.L.R. 1290 (1925).

§ 9-4-804.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; required security; contents and form of surety bond; definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

, for the security of state funds, the state treasurer shall require all state depositories to deposit securities of the kind and character described in W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

, or to furnish a surety bond, that meets the requirements of W.S. 9-4-801 through 9-4-815, for the payment of the deposits and interest thereon. Depositories which provide securities as collateral shall provide a report to the state treasurer semiannually in March and September regarding the current balance of and validity of securities so provided for verification by the state treasurer. Surety bonds, when given, shall run to the state of Wyoming, and together with the securities offered shall be approved by the state treasurer. At each quarterly meeting of the state board of deposits, the state treasurer shall provide a report to the board indicating the extent to which state depositories have provided surety bonds or other security in compliance with W.S. 9-4-801 through 9-4-815.

Surety bonds shall:

Be conditioned:

For the payment of the deposit and the interest thereon, as provided in W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

; and

That the depository do and perform whatever may be required by law for a faithful discharge of the trust reposed in the depository.

Contain the further obligation to settle with and pay to the state treasurer, for the use of the state, interest upon daily balance on the deposits, at the agreed upon rate, which shall not be less than the minimum rate fixed by the board of deposits, payable quarterly on the first business day of January, April, July and October in each year, or when the account is closed. As used in W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, a bank holiday in the state or other day that is considered a holiday for the employees of the state.

Surety bonds provided under this section shall:

Be approved as to form and substance by the attorney general; and

Be issued by a surety company which:

Is authorized to transact the business of a surety in this state; and

Is rated within the top two (2) ratings by A.M. Best, or has an equivalent rating.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 2490; C.S. 1920, § 2953; Laws 1925, ch. 77, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 92-105; C.S. 1945, § 20-1005; W.S. 1957, § 9-590; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1105; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 125, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(ii), inserted “agreed upon” and “which shall not be less than the minimum rate.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(ii), added the last sentence.

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

, 42 A.L.R. 1290 (1925).

§ 9-4-805.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; other acceptable security.

Instead of furnishing a surety bond as security for the deposits, a depository may pledge any bonds, debentures and other securities in which the state treasurer may by law invest and in an amount equal, at least, to the maximum amount of money at any time to be deposited with the bank. The bonds, debentures and other securities so pledged shall have a market value at least equal to the amount of the deposit. In addition, any depository may furnish as security for the deposit letters of credit issued by any Federal Home Loan Bank in such form as approved by the state treasurer of Wyoming or pledge conventional first mortgages of Wyoming real estate and notes connected with the mortgages at a ratio of one and one-half to one (1.5:1) of the value of public funds secured by them. A pledge of collateral as security for the deposit of public funds shall be accompanied by a written assignment from the depository vesting legal title thereto to the state and by any other instruments required by the state treasurer. The assignment shall provide that the depository shall pay over deposited public funds and accrued interest thereon to the state treasurer, or his authorized deputy, upon check, order or demand in accordance with this article. The assignment shall also provide that the state has the authority, if the depository defaults, to sell all collateral necessary to realize the full amount of deposited public funds and interest accrued thereon. The interest on bonds, debentures and other securities, so pledged, when paid shall be remitted to the bank so pledging them, as long as it is not in default.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 6; 1909, ch. 94, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2491; C.S. 1920, § 2954; Laws 1925, ch. 83, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 92-106; Laws 1937, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-1006; W.S. 1957, § 9-591; Laws 1965, ch. 77, § 1; 1969, ch. 66, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1106; Laws 1981, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 9, § 1; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

Escrow not within section's purview. —

Escrow is not such a deposit of public money as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

, 42 A.L.R. 1290 (1925).

§ 9-4-806.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; bank resolution.

Every bank designated as a depository for funds of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall furnish to the treasurer of the state of Wyoming, or treasurer of the appropriate political subdivision, a certified copy of the resolution adopted by its board of directors which shall be in:

A form acceptable to the state treasurer or treasurer of the appropriate political subdivision; or

Substantially the following form:

“WHEREAS, it is necessary for (name of designated depository) to properly secure the political division or subdivision for all monies deposited in the bank by the Treasurer of the political division or subdivision, hereinafter called the Treasurer; and

WHEREAS, no deposit will be made in the bank by the Treasurer unless the deposit is properly secured, and the giving of proper security is one of the considerations for receiving the deposits; and

WHEREAS, the Treasurer may, when furnished proper security, carry a maximum credit balance with the bank of
. . . . .
Dollars; and

WHEREAS, the Treasurer is willing to receive securities designated by laws of Wyoming as legal collateral security as security for the deposit;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED by the Board of Directors of the depository bank that any two of the following named persons, officers of the bank, are authorized and empowered to pledge to the Treasurer of the state or political subdivision securities of this bank which are legal for collateral security for deposit of public funds, and which the Treasurer is willing to accept as collateral security, and in amounts and at the time the Treasurer and bank officers agree upon:

(Bank Officer’s Name)
(Title)

“ ” “ ”

“ ” “ ”

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this authority given to the officers of the bank named herein to furnish collateral security to the Treasurer shall be continuing and shall be binding upon the bank until the authority given to the bank officers named herein is revoked or superseded by another resolution of this Board of Directors, verified copy of which shall be delivered by a representative of the bank to the Treasurer or mailed to the Treasurer by registered mail. The right given the officers named herein to pledge security as collateral also includes the right to give additional collateral security and to withdraw such collateral as the Treasurer is willing to surrender and the right to substitute one piece or lot of collateral for another, provided the Treasurer is willing to make such exchange or substitution.

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the bank officers named herein are fully authorized and empowered to execute in the name of the bank such collateral pledge agreement in favor of the Treasurer as the Treasurer requires, and any collateral pledge agreement executed or any act done by the bank officers named herein under the authority of this Resolution shall be as binding and effective upon this bank as though authorized by specific Resolution of the Board of Directors of this Bank.”

The certified copy required by subsection (a) of this section shall be provided at the time of the bank’s application or within thirty (30) days following the designation by the state board of deposits or proper governing board, as directed by the state treasurer or treasurer of the appropriate political subdivision.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-592; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1107; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “within thirty (30) days following the designation by the state board of deposits or proper governing board”; added (a)(i); added the (a)(ii) designation; added (b); and made related changes.

§ 9-4-807.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; federal insurance; security for deposits not covered.

Any properly designated depository of the public funds of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, which is entitled to the benefits of deposit insurance provided for by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the acts of congress relating thereto, shall give and at all times maintain security for the prompt payment and the safekeeping of the whole amount of any such deposit. The deposit insurance provided by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation is eligible as the security required for the portion of any deposit that is insured by the corporation, and constitutes all of the security required for the portion. Any portion of the deposit as is not so insured shall be secured by depository bond or approved collateral securities as required by law.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-1007; W.S. 1957, § 9-593; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1108; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 5, Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 9-4-808.
Deposit of state money in approved depositories; responsibility for collateral.

The state of Wyoming, or any political subdivision thereof, which deposits through its treasurer, or other representative, public funds in any designated depository in the state of Wyoming, receiving therefor collateral security, is responsible to the depository for the collateral.

In the event of loss of the collateral, the state or any political subdivision thereof, shall repay to the depository the value and accrued interest of the collateral.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 92-107, 92-108; C.S. 1945, §§ 20-1008, 20-1009; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-594, 9-595; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-7-1109, 9-7-1110; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-809.
“Time deposit, open account”; definition.

As used in W.S.

9-4-809

through

9-4-812

and

9-4-817

“time deposit, open account” means a deposit, other than a “time certificate of deposit” or a “savings deposit”, with respect to which “time deposit, open account” there is in force a written contract between the depositor and the depository bank that neither the whole or any part of the deposit may be withdrawn by the depositor, by check or otherwise, prior to the date of maturity or returned to the depositor by the depository, prior to the date of maturity, without written notice given not less than forty-five (45) days in advance of withdrawals or returns.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 20-1010, 20-1020; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-596, 9-604; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-7-1111, 9-7-1119; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 9-4-810.
“Time deposit, open account”; rate of interest on public funds.

Quarterly each year, taking into consideration all information before it, the board of deposits shall fix the minimum rate of interest to be paid on time deposit, open account. Time deposits shall be at the minimum rate of interest as fixed by the board or at such higher rate as agreed to by the depository bank. The minimum rate shall go into effect on the first day of April, July, October and January following as the case may be, and the rate shall not be changed for three (3) months.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 2492; C.S. 1920, § 2955; Laws 1925, ch. 77, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 92-109; Laws 1935, ch. 81, § 1; 1939, ch. 26, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 20-1011; W.S. 1957, § 9-597; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1112; Laws 1981, ch. 31, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; 2004, ch. 8, § 1; 2011, ch. 125, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

The 2004 amendment

deleted “which shall not be less than three percent (3%) per annum” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “minimum” preceding “rate” twice, and added the present second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, deleted “in March, June, September and December of” following “Quarterly.”

§ 9-4-811.
“Time deposit, open account”; payment of interest; accounts of monies.

Interest paid by banks on public funds on time deposit, open account shall be paid to the state treasurer quarterly on the first business day of January, April, July and October as required by the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall require, and every depository shall keep accurate accounts of all monies deposited with it, showing the amounts deposited and when deposited.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2493; C.S. 1920, § 2956; Laws 1931, ch. 82, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 92-110; Laws 1935, ch. 81, § 2; 1939, ch. 26, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 20-1012; W.S. 1957, § 9-598; Laws 1973, ch. 46, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1113; Laws 1980, ch. 17, § 1; 1981, ch. 31, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; 2007, ch. 117, § 1; 2015 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective substituted “in” for “on the first day of” in the first sentence and inserted “as required by the state treasurer” following “July and October.”

Laws 2007, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “on the first business day of January” for “in January.”

§ 9-4-812.
Withdrawals of state funds; liability of treasurer for money or bond loss.

The state treasurer or his authorized deputy may withdraw any and all funds deposited for the purpose of paying the appropriations and obligations of the state as lawfully required or whenever he deems it advisable or to the interests of the state to do so except funds deposited as time deposit, open account shall require notice in advance of withdrawal as specified in W.S.

9-4-809

. The state treasurer and his sureties are responsible for the faithful performance of the duties of the treasurer under the law, and for a proper accounting and turning over to his successor of all monies paid to the treasurer as such but he shall not be held personally liable for any monies that may be lost by reason of the failure or insolvency of any bank selected as a state depository nor for the deficiency or loss upon any surety bond or securities deposited by any bank, if the surety bond or securities were placed according to law, unless the loss could have been avoided by the exercise of reasonable care and diligence on the part of the treasurer or his deputy, in which case the treasurer is liable to the state for the loss.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 2494; C.S. 1920, § 2957; R.S. 1931, § 92-111; Laws 1939, ch. 26, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 20-1013; W.S. 1957, § 9-599; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1114; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 9-4-813.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 63, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 10, related to the procedure for depositing state funds when they could not be placed in designated banks, and the state treasurer's liability for their safekeeping in such event.

§ 9-4-814.
Sale of collateral.

The state treasurer may sell any or all collateral that may be pledged as security for the deposit of any state funds in any depository under this act, at public or private sale, whenever there shall be a failure or refusal upon the part of any state depository, to pay over the funds, or any part thereof or interest thereon, upon the demand or order of the state treasurer, or his authorized deputy on the state depository. Notice of the sale of collateral given as security for deposits is required only if the state treasurer finds that the collateral is illiquid. If notice is required, it shall be given by publication once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which real estate, in the case of mortgages, or the local governments, in the case of local government bonds, are located. When a sale of collateral is made by the state treasurer, either at public or private sale, and the collateral has been transferred by the chairman and secretary of the board of deposits, the absolute ownership of the collateral shall vest in the purchasers, upon the payment of the purchase money to the state treasurer. Should there be any surplus after paying the amount due the state and expenses of sale, it shall be paid to the state depository which made the pledge of the collateral.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 11; C.S. 1910, § 2496; C.S. 1920, § 2959; R.S. 1931, § 92-113; C.S. 1945, § 20-1015; W.S. 1957, § 9-601; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1116; Laws 1981, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” seemingly refers to Laws 1907, ch. 30, which appears as §§

9-1-409

,

9-4-801

through

9-4-805

,

9-4-810

through

9-4-812

,

9-4-814

through

9-4-818

,

9-4-820

,

9-4-821

,

9-4-824

and

9-4-829

.

§ 9-4-815.
Recovery of penalties on bonds.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general of the state to enter and prosecute, in the name of the state, to final determination, all suits for the recovery of any penalty arising under the conditions of any bond, securities or mortgages and notes connected with the mortgages given, or required to be given under this act to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 12; C.S. 1910, § 2497; C.S. 1920, § 2960; R.S. 1931, § 92-114; C.S. 1945, § 20-1016; W.S. 1957, § 9-602; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1117; Laws 1981, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See same catchline in notes following §

9-4-814

.

§ 9-4-816.
Deposits by political subdivisions; “proper governing board” defined.

As used in W.S.

9-4-817

through

9-4-831

“proper governing board” means:

When applied to the deposit of county funds, the board of county commissioners of the county;

When applied to the deposit of the funds of a city or town, the mayor and council of the city or town;

When applied to the deposit of school district funds, the board of trustees of the school district;

When applied to the deposit of irrigation district funds, the board of commissioners of the irrigation district; and

When applied to drainage district funds, the board of commissioners of the drainage district.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 15; C.S. 1910, § 2499; C.S. 1920, § 2962; Laws 1931, ch. 97, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 92-116; C.S. 1945, § 20-1018; W.S. 1957, § 9-605; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1120; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Treasurer not negligent for not interfering with fiscal contractby municipal authorities. —

A contract with a fiscal agent having been made by the mayor and city council, with no demand for security, the treasurer is not negligent in declining to interfere with the contract and demand security. Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

But obligated to withdraw funds upon bank's notification oftermination as depository. —

Where bank officials notify a town's mayor that the bank would no longer serve as a depository of town funds it becomes the town treasurer's duty to withdraw the funds and place them in another properly designated depository. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

Depository liable for interest where it accepts deposits aftertermination date. —

Where a local bank has been designated as a town depository, and it notifies the mayor that it will not pay interest on the town deposit after a certain date, and tells him to withdraw the account, but continues to accept deposits without objection after that date, it is liable for interest on the daily balance until it discontinues accepting deposits. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Reed v. People ex rel. Campbell County High Sch., 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1926).

§ 9-4-817.
Deposits by political subdivisions; selected institutions; security; withdrawals.

To the extent they are not otherwise invested, the monies collected and held by a treasurer of a political subdivision, municipality or special district within this state shall be deposited in banks which qualify as depositories for public monies as specified in W.S. 9-4-803(a).

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 98, § 2.

In depositing the monies in the financial institutions authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the treasurer shall select the institution:

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 3.

Designated as a depository by the proper governing board.

The deposits made pursuant to this section shall be made to the extent that they are:

Fully insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; or

Secured, in accordance with this article, by a pledge of collateral or the furnishing of a surety bond.

Any bank, savings and loan association or federal savings bank, located in the state, may apply to keep the monies upon the following conditions:

All deposits are subject to payment when demanded by the proper treasurer on his check, order or demand, except that all funds deposited on time deposit, open account shall be withdrawable, under W.S.

9-4-809

;

All funds deposited in a savings deposit account shall be withdrawable upon demand provided that the bank or savings and loan association may at any time require giving of notice in writing of an intended withdrawal of thirty (30) days before a withdrawal is made;

Interest shall be paid upon the amount deposited which constitutes a time deposit, open account;

All deposits are also subject to regulations imposed by law.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 16; C.S. 1910, § 2500; C.S. 1920, § 2964; Laws 1931, ch. 97, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 92-118; Laws 1933, ch. 131, § 1; 1935, ch. 66, § 1; 1939, ch. 31, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 20-1021; W.S. 1957, § 9-606; Laws 1977, ch. 134, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1121; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 219, § 2; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 1; 2006, ch. 38, § 1; 2017 ch. 98, § 1, § 2, effective March 2, 2017.

The 2006 amendment

deleted “and kept on deposit at all times” following “deposited” in the introductory language of (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 38, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, rewrote the section by repealing former (a)(i) through (a)(iv).

The second 2017 amendment, in (a), added banks which qualify as depositories for public monies as specified in
W.S. 9-4-803(a), and made a related change; and in (b), substituted “authorized by” for “enumerated in.”
Laws 2017, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2017.

Laws 2017, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

Section imposes duty on treasurer. —

This section imposes a duty upon the county treasurer and upon no one else to deposit and keep on deposit the money collected by him. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Escrow not within section's purview. —

Escrow is not such a deposit of public money as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Treasurer liable for funds lost by bank not designated depository. —

The county treasurer and his surety are liable on his bond for the loss of funds by the failure of a bank not designated as a depository. Reed v. People, 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1926).

But not negligent for not interfering with fiscal contract by municipal authorities. —

A contract with a fiscal agent having been made by the mayor and city council, with no demand for security, the treasurer is not negligent in declining to interfere with the contract and demand security. Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

And not liable for loss sustained by fiscal agent. —

A city treasurer, in transmitting moneys to the city's out-of-state fiscal agent to pay the interest and principal of the city's bonds, does not violate the state depository law, and is not liable for any loss sustained by the failure of the fiscal agent. Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

Interest from funds held by county treasurer. —

A county treasurer has a statutory duty and a common law fiduciary duty to act with reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty with regard to money held on behalf of a school district; investing these funds may be required in order to comply with these duties. Therefore, interest, as an accretion or increment of the principal fund earning it, belongs to the fund on which the interest was earned. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Bank obligated to pay interest, and money deposited upon demand. —

This section imposes no duty on the depository bank (aside from that of paying interest), except to pay the money deposited on the check or order of the county treasurer. Board of County Comm'rs v. First Nat'l Bank, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1962).

Where bank no longer acts as depository, treasurer obligated to withdraw money. —

Where it becomes clear that a bank no longer will act as a depository under laws governing such matters, it becomes the town treasurer's immediate duty to withdraw the money and to place it in another place properly designated as depository. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

But depository liable for interest where it accepts deposits after termination date. —

Where a local bank has been designated as a town depository, and it notifies the mayor that it will not pay interest on the town deposit after a certain date, and tells him to withdraw the account, but continues to accept deposits without objection after that date, it is liable for interest on the daily balance until it discontinues accepting deposits. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 9-4-818.
Deposits by political subdivisions; applications by, and approval of, banks; rate of interest; defaults.

Applications by banks and savings and loan associations shall be submitted to the proper governing board and shall be acted upon by the proper governing board as soon thereafter as practicable. Prior to the deposit, the board shall negotiate the rate of interest applicable to the deposit. No monies shall be deposited by any treasurer except in banks and savings and loan associations which have been approved by the proper governing board.

If any depository defaults, the treasurer for the local government may sell any or all collateral that is pledged as security for the deposit of public funds in the depository at public or private sale. Notice of the sale of the collateral is required only if the treasurer determines that the collateral is illiquid. If notice is required, it shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which real estate, in the case of mortgages, or local governments, in the case of local government bonds, are located, once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 17; C.S. 1910, § 2501; C.S. 1920, § 2965; R.S. 1931, § 92-119; C.S. 1945, § 20-1022; W.S. 1957, § 9-607; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1122; Laws 1981, ch. 31, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 32, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 2; 1997, ch. 63, § 1.

Escrow not within section's purview. —

Escrow is not such a deposit of public money as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Depository liable for interest where it accepts deposits aftertermination date. —

Where a local bank has been designated as a town depository, and it notifies the mayor that it will not pay interest on the town deposit after a certain date, and tells him to withdraw the account, but continues to accept deposits without objection after that date, it is liable for interest on the daily balance until it discontinues accepting deposits. Lusk State Bank v. Lusk, 48 Wyo. 547, 52 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Reed v. People ex rel. Campbell County High Sch., 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1926).

§ 9-4-819.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 32, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 18, related to the crediting of interest on public funds on deposit.